Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Public Utility Commis-
sion of Oregon, for the following purposes:
(1) Utility program ......................... $ 34,559,072
(2) Residential Service
Protection Fund ........................ $ 11,892,440
(3) Administration.......................... $ 9,577,396
(4) Oregon Board of Maritime
Pilots......................................... $ 893,969
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,180,926 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  from federal funds collected or received by the Public Utility Commis-
sion of Oregon.
SECTION 3. For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, expenditures by the Public Utility
Commission of Oregon from the universal service fund established in ORS 759.425  are not
limited.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 5032 (HB 5032-A) Page 1
Passed by House May 27, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 8, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5032 (HB 5032-A) Page 2